District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1303.03c

Child and Family Services Agency Transportation Fund.

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title III, § 303c
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5151, 57 DCR 181
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9065, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5151 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5151 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
Short title: Section 5150 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle P of title V of the act may be cited as the “Child and Family Services Transportation Fund Amendment Act of 2009”.